Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.710

Death benefits.

(1) If a member dies prior to retirement, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children shall receive a retirement allowance computed as provided in RCW 41.35.620 actuarially reduced to reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option and, except under subsection (2) of this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.35.680.

If the surviving spouse who is receiving the retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of majority.

If there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance, share and share alike. The allowance shall be calculated with the assumption that the age of the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death.

(2) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as determined by the director of the department of labor and industries, or a member who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.35.680. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.35.620.

[ 2009 c 226 s 9; 2003 c 155 s 5; 1998 c 341 s 212.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2003 c 155: See note following RCW 41.32.520.